test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-keessid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - peehiđ: # not checked

    peehiđ+V+Inf: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: peehuđ
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peehuum
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: peehuuh
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piähoo
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: piähojeen
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: peehuuvettee
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: peehuv
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: peehup
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: peehuuvetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: piähojeh
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: piähojim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: piähojih
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: peehui
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: peehuim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: peehuid
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: peehuin
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: peehuim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: peehuid
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: piähojii
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: peehuuččim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: peehuuččih
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: peehuuččij
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: peehuuččáim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: peehuuččáid
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: peehuuččáin
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: peehuuččijm
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: peehuuččijd
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: peehuuččii
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: peehuužeem
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: peehuužeeh
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: peehuš
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: peehuužeen
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: peehušvettee
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: peehuužává
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: peehuužep
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: peehušvetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: peehuužeh
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peehuu
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: peehum
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: peehuuččii
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: peehuužii
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc	+?
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: peehum
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: peehum
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: peehuumin
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: peehuumist
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: peehuumân
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger	+?
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: peehuuhánnáá
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peevâdâm
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: peevâdah
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peevâd
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: peevâdeen
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: peevâdvettee
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: peevâdává
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: peevâdeh
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peevâd
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: peevâdim
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: peevâdij
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: peevâdii
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: peevâdiččim
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: peevâdičij
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: peevâdižžeem
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: peevâdiš
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peevâd
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: peevâdâm
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: peevâdižžii
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: peevâdâm
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: peevâdhánnáá
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: peevâdem
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: peevâdmân
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: peevâdmin
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: peevâdmist
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: peevâddijn
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: peevâddijnân
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: peevâddijnâd
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: peevâddijnis
    peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: peehiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger	+?
    peehiđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peevistâm
    peehiđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peevittâm
    peehiđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peeveškuáđám
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pehâlâm
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peehâl
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pehâleen
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pehâleh
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peehâl
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pehâlim
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pehâlij
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pehâlii
